Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20268-3033
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Controllable Electronic Record Fraud Prevention Act:

(1) Blockchain analytics means the analysis of data from blockchains or public distributed ledgers, including associated transaction information;

(2) Blockchain analytics software means a software service that uses blockchain analytics data to provide risk-specific information about controllable electronic record addresses, among other things;

(3) Controllable electronic record has the same meaning as in section 8-3003;

(4) Controllable electronic record address means an alphanumeric identifier associated with a controllable electronic record wallet identifying the location to which a controllable electronic record transaction can be sent;

(5) Controllable electronic record kiosk means an electronic terminal acting as a mechanical agent of the controllable electronic record kiosk operator to enable the controllable electronic record kiosk operator to facilitate the exchange of controllable electronic records for money, bank credit, or other controllable electronic records, including, but not limited to, by (a) connecting directly to a separate controllable electronic record exchange that performs the actual controllable electronic record transmission or (b) drawing upon the controllable electronic record in the possession of the electronic terminal's operator;

(6) Controllable electronic record kiosk operator means a person, or a third party acting on behalf of another person, that engages in controllable electronic record business activity via a controllable electronic record kiosk located in this state or a person that owns, operates, or manages a money transmission kiosk located in this state through which controllable electronic record business activity is offered;

(7) Controllable electronic record kiosk transaction means a transaction conducted or performed, in whole or in part, by electronic means via a controllable electronic record kiosk. Controllable electronic record kiosk transaction includes, but is not limited to, a transaction made at a controllable electronic record kiosk (a) to purchase controllable electronic records with United States dollars, (b) to sell controllable electronic records for United States dollars, or (c) to fund a stored value account, which, at the time the stored value account is funded or thereafter, offers the ability to purchase a controllable electronic record and is utilized to purchase a controllable electronic record;

(8) Controllable electronic record wallet means a software application or other mechanism providing a means to hold the keys necessary to access and transfer controllable electronic records;

(9) Customer means new customers and existing customers;

(10) Department means the Department of Banking and Finance;

(11) Existing customer means an individual whose first controllable electronic record kiosk transaction with the controllable electronic record kiosk operator was more than fourteen days prior;

(12) New customer means an individual during the fourteen-day period after such individual's first transaction with the controllable electronic record kiosk operator that the individual has never previously transacted with. The individual shall remain defined as a new customer during the fourteen-day period after the first controllable electronic record kiosk transaction with the controllable electronic record kiosk operator; and

(13) Transaction hash means a unique identifier made up of a string of characters that acts as a record of and provides proof that the transaction was verified and added to the blockchain.

Laws 2025, LB609, § 2;

Laws 2026, LB717, § 23.
July 18, 2026